Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-919.02
Contested case; appeal; court review; de novo; deferral.

Any court reviewing an appeal from a contested case shall interpret the statute or rule or regulation de novo on the record and shall not defer to the agency's interpretation of such statute or rule or regulation.

Laws 2024, LB43, § 13.